Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 5. Quality Assurance Data

§ 1445.
Findings.

The General Assembly finds that the Vermont Program for Quality in Health Care, Inc., a nonprofit corporation, is organized for the purpose of implementing and maintaining a statewide quality assurance system based on the collection and interpretation of clinical data, feedback of such data to physicians and, when necessary, the provision of professional accountability.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 108

, § 3, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 1446.
Directors of corporation.

The Board of Directors of the Vermont Program for Quality in Health Care, Inc. shall include the Commissioner of Health and two directors, each of whom represents at least one of the following populations: elders, people with disabilities, or people with low income.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 108

, § 3, eff. June 22, 1989; amended

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 175.

§ 1447.
Dissolution.

In the event of dissolution without a successor, the corporation shall transfer all its quality assurance data to the Department of Health.
While the data is in the possession of the Department of Health, the Commissioner may disclose such data to the public as long as individual patients or health care practitioners are not directly or indirectly identifiable.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 108

, § 3, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 1448.
Release of clinical data authorized.

Hospitals licensed under

18 V.S.A. § 1905

may release clinical data to the Vermont Program for Quality in Health Care, Inc., for use in a statewide quality assurance system.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 108

, § 3, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 1449.
Repealed. 2009, No. 33, § 83(k).